Washington statutes.
RCW 27.15.050

Financing—Bonds authorized.

(1) A library capital facility area may contract indebtedness or borrow money to finance library capital facilities and may issue general obligation bonds for such purpose not exceeding an amount, together with any existing indebtedness of the library capital facility area, equal to one and one-quarter percent of the value of the taxable property in the district and impose excess property tax levies to retire the general indebtedness as provided in RCW 39.36.050 if a ballot proposition authorizing both the indebtedness and excess levies is approved by at least three-fifths of the voters of the library capital facility area voting on the proposition, and the total number of voters voting on the proposition constitutes not less than forty percent of the total number of voters in the library capital facility area voting at the last preceding general election. The term "value of the taxable property" has the meaning set forth in RCW 39.36.015. Such a proposition shall be submitted to voters at a general or special election and may be submitted to voters at the same election as the election when the ballot proposition authorizing the establishing of the library capital facility area is submitted. If the proposed election date is not a general election, the county legislative authority is encouraged to request an election when another unit of local government with territory located in the proposed library capital facility area is already holding a special election under RCW 29A.04.330.

(2) A library capital facility area may accept gifts or grants of money or property of any kind for the same purposes for which it is authorized to borrow money in subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2015 c 53 s 5; 1996 c 258 s 2; 1995 c 368 s 6.]

NOTES: